Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Method of Selecting School Boards in School Divisions Composed of a Single County.

§ 22.1-34.
Application of article.

The school board in each county constituting a school division, except a county to which the provisions of §§

15.2-410

,

15.2-531

,

15.2-627

,

15.2-837

or § 22.1-44 are applicable, shall be selected as provided in this article.

History.

1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-35.
School board selection commission.

In each county to which the provisions of this article are applicable there shall be a school board selection commission composed of three members appointed from the county at large or, upon the request of the county governing body, one member appointed from each election district of such county. Members shall be qualified voters, shall reside in the county and shall not be county or state officers. Members shall be appointed by the circuit court of the county within thirty days after the first day of July, 1950, and every four years thereafter. Any vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled by the circuit court within thirty days after the vacancy occurs. Each member shall receive twenty-five dollars for each day actually engaged in the performance of duties as such member, to be paid out of the funds of the school board. No person regularly employed by the school board of the division shall be eligible to serve on or as clerk of such school board selection commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-60; 1956, c. 365; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1972, cc. 224, 665; 1973, c. 275; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-36.
Composition of school board; to be appointed by commission.

The county school board shall consist of the same number of members from each magisterial district or, if the provisions of subsection C of §

15.2-1211

are applicable, election district in the county as there are members of the board of supervisors from each such district in the county. Each school board member shall be appointed by the school board selection commission. In addition to the members selected by districts, the governing body may authorize the school board selection commission to appoint no more than two members from the county at large.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-61; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 25; 1970, c. 88; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 225; 1972, c. 137; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-36.1.
Composition of school board in certain cases.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a county contains a town that is a separate school division, the school board for such county, regardless of whether it is elected or appointed, shall have no member representing such town. Instead, the county school board shall be comprised of one member elected or appointed from
all of the election districts other than districts which have more than five percent of town residents, and an additional member elected or appointed at large from the entire county, excluding the town.

History.

1993, c. 220; 1995, c. 316; 2002, cc. 146, 269.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 220, which enacted this section, in cl. 2 provides:
“That the provisions of this act shall become effective in due course but shall in no case have the effect of terminating or reducing the term of office of a county school board member appointed to represent a town on a county school board whose term began before the effective date of this act.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 146 and 269 are identical, and in the first sentence, deleted “and contains an entire supervisor election district” following “separate school division” and substituted “representing such town” for “representing such election district”; and in the second sentence, substituted “all of the” for “each of the remaining” and inserted “other than districts which have more than five percent of town residents.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Member of town council may serve on county school board, subject to certain restrictions. —

A town councilman may concurrently serve on the county school board, provided all other eligibility requirements are met. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William A. Bell, Jr., Secretary, Isle of Wight County Electoral Board, 11-070, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 41 (9/30/11).

Members of town councils generally are precluded from serving on appointed school boards by § 22.1-30, but § 22.1-30 applies only to appointed school boards; however, members of both town councils and school boards are subject to restrictions imposed by the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William A. Bell, Jr., Secretary, Isle of Wight County Electoral Board, 11-070, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 41 (9/30/11).

§ 22.1-37.
Notice by commission of meeting for appointment.

Before any appointment is made by the school board selection commission, it shall give notice, by publication once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in such county, of the time and place of any meeting for the purpose of appointing the members of the county school board. Such notice shall be given whether the appointment is of a member or members of the county school board for the full term of office as provided by law or of a member to fill a vacancy occurring in the membership of the county school board or of a member from a new school district.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-62; 1954, c. 638; 1980, c. 559; 1984, c. 131.

§ 22.1-38.
Terms of members of school board.

Within sixty days prior to July 1 in each and every year, the school board selection commission shall appoint, for terms of four years beginning July 1 next following their appointment, successors to the members of the county school board whose terms of office expire on June 30 of such year.

In any county having five or more districts in which it is found by the school board selection commission that it is not in the best interest of the schools for the terms of the school board members from two certain districts to expire simultaneously and such terms have been so expiring, the commission may, on the next occasion thereafter for appointing successors to the school board members from such two districts, appoint the member from one of such districts for a term of one year with appointments thereafter to be made for terms of four years.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-64; 1958, c. 515; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-38.1.
Provisions for school board where division consolidated as result of certain governmental consolidations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 22.1-38 and 22.1-57 or any other statutory provision, in any consolidation of school divisions comprised of single cities and single counties, which consolidation constitutes a part of a governmental consolidation resulting in the formation of a consolidated county and a tier-city, the consolidation agreement may provide as follows:

The effective date for consolidation of school divisions may be prior or subsequent to the effective date for general governmental consolidation.

Initial members of the consolidated school board selection committee may be selected as provided in § 22.1-35 from the consolidating divisions at any time after certification by the appropriate electoral boards of approval by referendum of the consolidation plan.

Initial members of the consolidated school board may be selected to assume office at any agreed time prior to the effective date for consolidation of school divisions, only for such of the following limited purposes as may be provided by the consolidation agreement or plan:

Organization of itself and election of one of its members as chairman.

Preparation and approval of an initial budget applicable to the newly consolidated school divisions.

Preparation of job descriptions, pay ranges and qualifications for each position in the consolidated school division.

Hiring of individuals to hold each position in the consolidated school division.

Designation of school attendance zones.

Allocation of office space and furniture to accommodate the administrative staff of the consolidated school division.

Preparation of seniority lists and reductions in force policy.

Approval of initial curriculum, grading systems, and all such forms of records as may be required.

Adoption of a transportation plan for the consolidated school division.

Any member of a school board of a consolidating school division may be appointed to the consolidated school board, and for the limited time period as provided in the consolidation agreement may hold both offices.

Upon the effective date of consolidation of school divisions, all school board members shall assume full powers, duties, rights and responsibilities of their offices.

History.

1984, c. 695.

§ 22.1-39.
Vacancies in school board.

Vacancies occurring in the membership of the county school board shall be filled for the unexpired term by the school board selection commission.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-65; 1980, c. 559.

§ 22.1-40.
Appointment of tie breaker.

The school board selection commission may, at the option of the governing body of the county, appoint a qualified voter who is a resident of the county to cast the deciding vote in case of a tie vote of the school board as provided in § 22.1-75. The term of office of each tie breaker so appointed shall be four years whether the appointment is to fill a vacancy caused by expiration of term or otherwise. The commission shall give the notice required by § 22.1-37 before appointing any tie breaker.

History.

1980, c. 559; 1981, c. 246.